Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.690

Border county higher education opportunity project—Administration.

The office shall administer Washington's participation in the border county higher education opportunity project.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 125; 2003 c 159 s 3; 2002 c 130 s 4; 1999 c 320 s 3. Formerly RCW 28B.80.807.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.